Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-214
Judicial proceedings; transfer; judgments and liens, effect.

The courts of any county or counties from which such new county is erected may, by proper order, transfer any suit or other legal proceeding affecting real estate in such new county to the proper court of such new county, or may transfer any suit and all papers and records pertaining thereto to such new county, when all parties thereto are residents of such new county; but all judgments and other liens in the county or counties from which such new county was erected shall have the same effect as if no new county had been erected.

Laws 1879, § 15, p. 357;

R.S.1913, § 925;

C.S.1922, § 831;

C.S.1929, § 25-214;

R.S.1943, § 22-214.